Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1802.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage of COVID-19 Vaccines.--(a) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for COVID-19 vaccines with no cost-sharing.(b) A government program shall provide coverage for COVID-19 12345678910111213141516171819202122 vaccines without cost-sharing.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost-sharing" means:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered person pays out-of-pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.(3) The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."COVID-19" means the coronavirus disease 2019, an infectious disease caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 that was first identified during December 2019 in Wuhan, China."COVID-19 vaccine" means a vaccine approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in the prevention of COVID-19."Government program" means:(1) The Commonwealth's medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(2) The children's health insurance program under Article XXIII-A."Health insurance policy" means:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.20250HB1802PN2216 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A fixed indemnity policy.(vii) A dental only policy.(viii) A vision only policy.(ix) A workers' compensation policy.(x) An automobile medical payment policy.(xi) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents, including a Tricare policy or a Civilian Health And Medical Program of the United States (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(xii) A hospital indemnity policy.(xiii) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Insurer" means an entity licensed by the Insurance Department that offers, issues or renews a health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health 20250HB1802PN2216 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services plan corporations).Section 2. A health insurance policy that is in effect on the effective date of this section and provides coverage of COVID-19 vaccines without cost-sharing may not, during the period between the effective date and the applicability date, eliminate or reduce coverage of COVID-19 vaccines or impose cost-sharing on COVID-19 vaccines.Section 3. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1802PN2216 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021